ja: トーンアームタイプ: カーブド; J型; S型; ストレート; その他
ko: 톤암 유형: 곡선형; J자형; S자형; 일자형; 기타
zh-CN: 唱臂类型: 弧形; J 形; S 形; 直线型; 其他
nl: Toonarm type: Gebogen; J-vormig; S-vormig; Steil; Andere
en: Tonearm type: Curved; J-shaped; S-shaped; Straight; Other
cs: Typ raménka: Zaoblené; Tvar písmene J; Tvar písmene S; Rovný; Jiné
pl: Typ ramienia: Zakrzywiony; J-kształtny; Kształt litery S; Prosty; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta tonarma: Zaobljeno; U obliku slova J; U obliku slova S; Ravna; Ostalo
sv: Tonarmstyp: Rundad; J-formad; S-formad; Rakt; Övrigt
sl-SI: Tip tonske roke: Ukrivljena; V obliki črke J; V obliki črke S; Ravni; Drugo
it: Tipo di braccio: Curvo; A forma di J; A forma di S; Dritto; Altro
de: Tonarmtyp: Gebogen; J-förmig; S-förmig; Gerade; Sonstiges
da: Tonearm-type: Buet; J-formet; S-formet; Lige; Andet
bg-BG: Тип на рамото: Извит; J-образна; S-образен; Прав; Други
vi: Loại cánh tay: Cong; Hình chữ J; Hình chữ S; Thẳng; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de braço de leitura: Curvado; Em forma de J; Em forma de S; Liso; Outro
lt-LT: Tonarmo tipas: Lenktas; J formos; S formos; Tiesus; Kita
sk-SK: Typ ramena: Zaoblený; v tvare písmena J; V tvare písmena S; Rovný; Iné
nb: Tonearm type: Buet; J-formet; S-formet; Rett; Annet
ro-RO: Tip braț: Curbat; În formă de J; În formă de S; Dreaptă; Altele
ru: Тип тонарма: Изогнутый; J-образная; S-образный; Прямой; Другой
tr: Ton kolu tipi: Kavisli; J şekilli; S şekilli; Düz; Diğer
zh-TW: 唱臂類型: 弧形; J 型; S 型; 直式; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de braço: Curvado; Em forma de J; Em forma de S; Liso; Outro
fi: Äänivarren tyyppi: Kaareva; J-muotoinen; S-muotoinen; Suora; Muu
el: Τύπος βραχίονα: Καμπυλωτή; Σε σχήμα V; Σε σχήμα S; Ευθύ; Άλλο
fr: Type de bras de lecture: Incurvée; en forme de J; En forme de S; Lisses; Autre
es: Tipo de brazo: Curvado; En forma de J; En forma de S; Liso; Otros
th: ประเภทโทนอาร์ม: โค้ง; รูปตัว J; รูปตัว S; ผมตรง; อื่นๆ
hu: Hangkartípus: Ívelt; J alakú; S alakú; Egyenes; Egyéb